District of Columbia statutes.
2-218.54

Department reporting requirements.

(a)

Within 45 days after its receipt of the annual reports required by § 2-218.53(b), the Department shall submit to the District of Columbia Auditor, through the Compliance Unit established part K of subchapter I of Chapter 3 of Title 1 [§ 1-301.181 et seq.], the following documents and information:

(1)

A copy of the annual reports required by § 2-218.53; and

(2)

A chart listing the following information with respect to each agency for the current fiscal year:

(A)

The total budget of each agency;

(B)

The expendable budget of each agency;

(C)

A description of each funding source, object class, object, or item that was excluded from the total budget of the agency in the Department’s calculation of the expendable budget of the agency;

(D)

Each goal of the agency under § 2-218.41 in percentage and dollar terms; and

(E)

The actual dollar amount expended with each small business enterprise and certified business enterprise.

(b)

Within 45 days after its receipt of the annual reports required by § 2-218.50(g), the Department shall submit to the District of Columbia Auditor, through the Compliance Unit established by part K of subchapter I of Chapter 3 of Title 1 [§ 1-301.181 et seq.] a report containing the following information with respect to each government corporation for the current and prior fiscal years:

(1)

The expendable budget of the government corporation.

(2)

A list of all agencies and government corporations that have not submitted a report for that quarter with a detailed explanation of what actions were taken by the Department to effectuate compliance with the reporting requirement.

(c)

On a semiannual basis, the Department shall report the following to the chairman of the Council committee that has purview over the Department:

(1)

District agencies’ compliance with § 2-218.41;

(2)

A list of contracting opportunities for small business enterprises and certified business enterprises with District agencies;

(3)

A list of projects in the District that require a 35% minimum subcontracting requirement in accordance with § 2-218.46;

(4)

A list of beneficiaries, small business enterprises, certified business enterprises, or certified joint ventures that fail to meet the 35% minimum subcontracting requirements in accordance with § 2-218.46;

(5)

A list of projects in the District that have a 20% equity and development participation requirement in accordance with § 2-218.49a;

(6)

A list of beneficiaries that fail to meet the 20% equity and development participation requirements in accordance with § 2-218.49a;

(7)

A list of District government contracts or procurements and government-assisted projects that were granted waivers or modifications to the requirements set forth in § 2-218.46;

(8)

A list of District agencies that fail to meet the requirements set forth in § 2-218.41; and

(9)

A list of small business enterprises and certified business enterprises.

Oct. 20, 2005, D.C. Law 16-33, § 2354, 52 DCR 7503
Apr. 7, 2006, D.C. Law 16-91, § 129, 52 DCR 10637
Mar. 2, 2007, D.C. Law 16-191, § 5(o)(3), 53 DCR 6794
Mar. 2, 2007, D.C. Law 16-192, § 2132(h), 53 DCR 6899
July 18, 2008, D.C. Law 17-207, § 2(o), 55 DCR 6107
Mar. 3, 2010, D.C. Law 18-111, § 2222(c), 57 DCR 181
June 10, 2014, D.C. Law 20-108, § 2(ff), 61 DCR 3892
D.C. Law 16-91, in the introductory language, validated a previously made technical correction.
D.C. Law 16-191, in the introductory language, validated a previously made technical correction.
D.C. Law 16-192 designated the existing language as subsec. (a); in subsec. (a)(2), deleted “; and” from the end of subpar. (C), substituted “; and” for a period at the end of subpar. (D), and added subpar. (E); and added subsecs. (b) and (c).
D.C. Law 17-207, rewrote subsec. (a)(2)(E), which had read as follows: “(E) The actual dollar amount expended with each business enterprise.”; and, in subsec. (b)(3)(D), deleted “local, small, or disadvantaged” following “was a”.
D.C. Law 18-111 rewrote the section.
The 2014 amendment by D.C. Law 20-108 substituted “45 days after its receipt” for “45 days of its receipt” in the introductory language of (a) and (b); substituted “small business enterprise and certified business enterprise” for “certified business enterprise” in (a)(2)(E); and added (c).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2(b) of Department of Small and Local Business Development Clarification Temporary Amendment Act of 2005 (D.C. Law 16-49, February 9, 2006, law notification 53 DCR 1457).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2(f) of the Department of Small and Local Business Development Subcontracting Clarification Temporary Amendment Act of 2006 (D.C. Law 16-214, March 6, 2007, law notification 54 DCR 2761).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2(n) of the Department of Small and Local Business Development Subcontracting Clarification, Benefit Expansion, and Grant-making Authority Temporary Amendment Act of 2007 (D.C. Law 17-96, January 29, 2008, law notification 55 DCR 3403).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 2354 of Fiscal Year 2006 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2005 (D.C. Act 16-168, July 26, 2005, 52 DCR 7667).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2(b) of Department of Small and Local Business Development Clarification Emergency Act of 2005 (D.C. Act 16-191, October 28, 2005, 52 DCR 10026).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2(b) of Department of Small and Local Business Development Clarification Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-301, February 27, 2006, 53 DCR 1883).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2132(h) of Fiscal Year 2007 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-477, August 8, 2006, 53 DCR 7068).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2132(h) of Fiscal Year 2007 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-499, October 23, 2006, 53 DCR 8845).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2(f) of Department of Small and Local Business Development Subcontracting Clarification Emergency Amendment Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-513, October 25, 2006, 53 DCR 9091).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2(f) of Department of Small and Local Business Development Subcontracting Clarification Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-575, December 19, 2006, 54 DCR 24).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2132(h) of Fiscal Year 2007 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2007 (D.C. Act 17-1, January 16, 2007, 54 DCR 1165).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2(n) of Department of Small and Local Business Development Subcontracting Clarification, Benefit Expansion, and Grant-making Authority Emergency Amendment Act of 2007 (D.C. Act 17-156, October 18, 2007, 54 DCR 10919).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2(n) of Department of Small and Local Business Development Subcontracting Clarification, Benefit Expansion, and Grant-making Authority Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2008 (D.C. Act 17-251, January 23, 2008, 55 DCR 1259).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2222(c) of Fiscal Year 2010 Budget Support Second Emergency Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-207, October 15, 2009, 56 DCR 8234).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2222(c) of Fiscal Year Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-260, January 4, 2010, 57 DCR 345).
For temporary (90 days) repeal of D.C. Law 20-108, § 4(c), see § 7005 of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-377, July 14, 2014, 61 DCR 7598, 20 STAT 3696).
For temporary (90 days) repeal of D.C. Law 20-108, § 4(c), see § 7005 of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-449, October 10, 2014, 61 DCR 10915, 20 STAT 4188).
For temporary (90 days) repeal of D.C. Law 20-108, § 4(c), see § 7005 of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Second Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-566, January 9, 2015, 62 DCR 884, 21 STAT 541).

Applicability of D.C. Law 20-108: Section 4(a) of D.C. Law 20-108 provided that applications pending as of June 10, 2014, shall not be subject to the provisions of the act.

Section 4(b) of D.C. Law 20-108 provided that, except as provided in § 2-218.46(f), contracts existing or pending as of June 10, 2014, shall not be affected by the provisions of the act.

Section 4(c) of D.C. Law 20-108 provided that the act shall apply upon the inclusion of its fiscal effect in an approved budget and financial plan, as certified by the Chief Financial Officer to the Budget Director of the Council in a certification published by the Council in the District of Columbia Register.

Section 4(c) of D.C. Law 20-108 was repealed by D.C. Law 20-155, § 7005.